Washington statutes.
RCW 9.94.047

Posting of perimeter of premises of institutions covered by RCW 9.94.040 through 9.94.049.

The perimeter of the premises of correctional institutions covered by RCW 9.94.040 through 9.94.049 shall be posted at reasonable intervals to alert the public as to the existence of RCW 9.94.040 through 9.94.049.

[ 1979 c 121 s 5.]